Massachusetts, session 194th, H2020.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 186 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by adding the following section:-
Section 31. (a) As used in this section, the word “tenant” shall mean a person who has
entered into an oral or written lease or rental agreement for residential property located in the
commonwealth who is: (i) 65 years of age or older, (ii) a person with a disability as defined in 42
U.S.C. § 12102 or (iii) a person with income at or below 80 percent of the area median income as
determined by the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development.
(b) A tenant may terminate a rental agreement or tenancy upon written notification to the
property owner that the tenant applied for and is accepted for admission to housing for the
elderly, persons with disabilities or persons of low to moderate income, including, but not
limited to: (1) a nursing home licensed pursuant to section 71 of chapter 111; (2) an assisted
living residence certified pursuant to section 3 of chapter 19D; (3) elderly housing, as defined in
of 2

section 1 of said chapter 19D; (4) a public housing development, as defined in section 32B of
chapter 121B; (5) publicly-assisted housing, as defined in section 1 of chapter 40T; (6) age
restricted housing for persons 55 years of age and over; and (7) low or moderate income housing,
as defined in section 20 of chapter 40B; provided, that the notification is made not less than 30
days prior to the date of termination of the rental agreement or tenancy. A tenant who provides
written notification to the property owner not less than 30 days prior to the date of termination of
the rental agreement or tenancy shall not be subject to any penalty for such termination or
liability for the remaining term of the rental agreement or tenancy.
(c) A property owner shall not refuse to enter into a rental agreement, nor shall a housing
subsidy provider deny assistance, based on an applicant having terminated a rental agreement
pursuant to subsection (b).
(d) A waiver of subsection (b) in any lease or other rental agreement, except as otherwise
provided by law shall be void and unenforceable.
(e) The superior court, housing court, district court and Boston municipal court shall have
jurisdiction in equity to restrain violations of subsections (b) through (d), inclusive.
(f) The department of housing and community development shall promulgate rules and
regulations to implement and carry out this section, including defining additional types of
housing for the elderly, persons with disabilities or persons of low to moderate income for which
a tenancy may be terminated pursuant to subsection (b).
of 2